Massachusetts, session 194th, H2006.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out subsection 16A and inserting in place thereof the following:-

16A. For an employer, personally or through its agents, to sexually harass any employee;
or to retaliate, personally or through its agents, against any employee for filing a complaint of
sexual harassment or discrimination based on sex, gender identity or sexual orientation or for
cooperating in an investigation of a complaint of sexual harassment or discrimination based on
sex, gender identity or sexual orientation, including, but not limited to, by termination,
suspension, demotion or reduction in the compensation or benefits of the employee; or to require,
of 2

as a condition of employment, continuing employment, promotion, compensation or the receipt
of benefits, entering into an agreement that contains a nondisclosure or confidentiality provision
(except as may be necessary to protect business intellectual property and trade secrets), a non-
disparagement provision, a restriction on reporting sexual harassment or discrimination based on
sex, gender identity or sexual orientation or participating in the investigation of a report of sexual
harassment or discrimination based on sex, gender identity or sexual orientation, or a waiver of
any rights or remedies available under law with respect to claims filed or that may be filed in a
civil action or complaints filed or that may be filed in an administrative action for sexual
harassment or discrimination based on sex, gender identity or sexual orientation.
of 2